lexc/verb/enhuige.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot 
                   +Inf +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                   +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3

      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igee§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§felteo§ §eo§ §j§ §szorelol§ §tatt§ §aet§ §aen§ §oe2§ §ae2§
§sj§ §sj1§  §igeoe§ §igeou§ §igeoue§
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §igeamely§ §igeomely§ §igeo2mely§ §igeumely§ §igeemely§ §igeuo§  §igeuomely§
§igejakik1mely§ §igejatokitek1mely§ §igeija1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§
§felteomely§ §szorelolmely§ §l§
§igeoo§ §igeoomely§

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Verb1;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON AddVerboeet
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoeet;

LEXICON Repoeet
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imperoeet;
                    Imper1oeet;

LEXICON Imperoeet
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoeet;
                      Nrepoeet2;
LEXICON Imper1oeet
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Nrepoeet;
                      Nrep1oeet;

LEXICON Nrepoeet
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoeet;
                      NImperoeet2;
LEXICON Nrepoeet2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoeet;
                      NImperoeet2;

LEXICON Nrep1oeet
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImperoeet;
                      NImper1oeet;

LEXICON NImperoeet
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoeet;
                      Potoeet2;
LEXICON NImperoeet2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoeet;
                      Potoeet2;

LEXICON NImper1oeet
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Potoeet;
                      Pot1oeet;

LEXICON Potoeet
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeet;
             Caseoe;
LEXICON Potoeet2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeet;
             Caseoe;

LEXICON Pot1oeet
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeet;
             Case1oe; ! case1 if differs

LEXICON AddInfoeet
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
               Caseoe;

! AddVerboeet this uses the Cases of AddVerboe

LEXICON AddVerboe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoe;

LEXICON Repoe
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imperoe;
                    Imper1oe;

LEXICON Imperoe
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoe;
                      Nrepoe2;
LEXICON Imper1oe
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrepoe;
                      Nrep1oe;

LEXICON Nrepoe
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;
LEXICON Nrepoe2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;

LEXICON Nrep1oe
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImper1oe;

LEXICON NImperoe
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Potoe2;
LEXICON NImperoe2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Potoe2;

LEXICON NImper1oe
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Pot1oe;

LEXICON Verb
abál AddVerboe;
adminisztrál AddVerboe;
aggregál AddVerboe;
ajnároz AddVerboe;
aktualizál AddVerboe;
alelnököl AddVerboe;
allergizál AddVerboe;
alázatosul AddVerboe;
annihilál AddVerboe;
anyagcserél AddVerboe;
applikál AddVerboe;
archivál AddVerboe;
aszal AddVerboe;
avizál AddVerboe;
babrásul AddVerboe;
barbarizál AddVerboe;
batikol AddVerboe;
beretvál AddVerboe;
birizgál AddVerboe;
bliccel AddVerboe;
bokszol AddVerboe;
bordíroz AddVerboe;
botol AddVerboe;
buherál AddVerboe;
buzerál AddVerboe;
bányász AddVerboe;
bóbiskol AddVerboe;
bömböl AddVerboe;
bővül AddVerboe;
cibál AddVerboe;
cikákol AddVerboe;
cirkál AddVerboe;
csencsel AddVerboe;
csikiz AddVerboe;
csodál AddVerboe;
csíkosul AddVerboe;
csúszkál AddVerboe;
dalol AddVerboe;
definiál AddVerboe;
dekorál AddVerboe;
deperszonalizál AddVerboe;
determinál AddVerboe;
diagonál AddVerboe;
disszertál AddVerboe;
dohosul AddVerboe;
dribliz AddVerboe;
duruzsol AddVerboe;
dörgöl AddVerboe;
egalizál AddVerboe;
elegyül AddVerboe;
emel AddVerboe;
eszel AddVerboe;
exhumál AddVerboe;
fabrikál AddVerboe;
farkal AddVerboe;
feketéz AddVerboe;
feszül AddVerboe;
fixál AddVerboe;
fordul AddVerboe;
frekventál AddVerboe;
futkos AddVerboe;
fércel AddVerboe;
fürkész AddVerboe;
gardíroz AddVerboe;
gingallóz AddVerboe;
grasszál AddVerboe;
gyaláz AddVerboe;
gyömöszöl AddVerboe;
gügyörész AddVerboe;
hajsókál AddVerboe;
harmadol AddVerboe;
határol AddVerboe;
hetel AddVerboe;
hitványul AddVerboe;
hospitál AddVerboe;
hárul AddVerboe;
húzgál AddVerboe;
ifjul AddVerboe;
impregnál AddVerboe;
ingerül AddVerboe;
internalizál AddVerboe;
ionizál AddVerboe;
ittasul AddVerboe;
járdogál AddVerboe;
kalapácsol AddVerboe;
kanalizál AddVerboe;
karakterizál AddVerboe;
kaszál AddVerboe;
kelepel AddVerboe;
keskenyül AddVerboe;
klasszicizál AddVerboe;
kokszol AddVerboe;
komolyul AddVerboe;
koncol AddVerboe;
konkurál AddVerboe;
konvergál AddVerboe;
koreografál AddVerboe;
kotkodácsol AddVerboe;
kukacol AddVerboe;
kurrentál AddVerboe;
kvittel AddVerboe;
képedez AddVerboe;
kócol AddVerboe;
könyörül AddVerboe;
közösül AddVerboe;
lanyhul AddVerboe;
legel AddVerboe;
licitál AddVerboe;
lomposul AddVerboe;
láttamoz AddVerboe;
lófrál AddVerboe;
magasztosul AddVerboe;
mardos AddVerboe;
maszlagol AddVerboe;
megúsz AddVerboe;
meszel AddVerboe;
mixel AddVerboe;
monopolizál AddVerboe;
mozdul AddVerboe;
méltányol AddVerboe;
nacionalizál AddVerboe;
negyedel AddVerboe;
nosztrifikál AddVerboe;
nyiszál AddVerboe;
náspángol AddVerboe;
okkupál AddVerboe;
optál AddVerboe;
pacsmagol AddVerboe;
parafál AddVerboe;
patentíroz AddVerboe;
perdül AddVerboe;
pezsdül AddVerboe;
pirul AddVerboe;
pliszíroz AddVerboe;
politizál AddVerboe;
preferál AddVerboe;
profitál AddVerboe;
prédikál AddVerboe;
pulzál AddVerboe;
pénzel AddVerboe;
pünkösdöl AddVerboe;
ratifikál AddVerboe;
regisztrál AddVerboe;
relativizál AddVerboe;
replikál AddVerboe;
revanzsál AddVerboe;
ritualizál AddVerboe;
ruccan AddVerboe;
részegül AddVerboe;
rúgkapál AddVerboe;
seggel AddVerboe;
sikál AddVerboe;
slamposul AddVerboe;
sorjáz AddVerboe;
sprayesül AddVerboe;
statuál AddVerboe;
studíroz AddVerboe;
szabadságol AddVerboe;
szangvinikusul AddVerboe;
szedál AddVerboe;
szelel AddVerboe;
szemrevételez AddVerboe;
szeptikusul AddVerboe;
szilajul AddVerboe;
sziruposul AddVerboe;
szortíroz AddVerboe;
szunyál AddVerboe;
szvingel AddVerboe;
számosul AddVerboe;
színesül AddVerboe;
szökdös AddVerboe;
szül AddVerboeet;
szőkül AddVerboe;
sétál AddVerboe;
sül AddVerboeet;
tabulál AddVerboe;
tapasztal AddVerboe;
taszigál AddVerboe;
tematizál AddVerboe;
termetesül AddVerboe;
tilol AddVerboe;
toldoz AddVerboe;
torlaszol AddVerboe;
transzponál AddVerboe;
trébel AddVerboe;
tunyul AddVerboe;
táncol AddVerboe;
térdel AddVerboe;
tönköl AddVerboe;
tüskésül AddVerboe;
unpraktikusul AddVerboe;
vacakul AddVerboe;
valósul AddVerboe;
ventilál AddVerboe;
vetül AddVerboe;
világiasul AddVerboe;
vitamindúsul AddVerboe;
vonszol AddVerboe;
végtelenül AddVerboe;
zabál AddVerboe;
zrikál AddVerboe;
zsörtöl AddVerboe;
zöngicsél AddVerboe;
ámul AddVerboe;
ékel AddVerboe;
érzékenyül AddVerboe;
öklel AddVerboe;
ötszöröz AddVerboe;
üldöz AddVerboe;
üzletel AddVerboe;
LEXICON Verb1
arrébbül AddVerboe;
eldogmatizál AddVerboe;
ittpusztul AddVerboe;
odébbgurul AddVerboe;
odébbvonul AddVerboe;
telimázol AddVerboe;
viszontauditál AddVerboe;
